test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-Clex_muottii_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - muottii: # MLO, checked
    muottii+A+Attr: muottiis
    muottii+A+Sg+Nom: muottii
    muottii+A+Pl+Nom: muottiih

    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: muottib
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: muottib
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc: muottib
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: muottiibân
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: muottiibist
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: muottiibáin
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: muottibttáá
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: muottiibin
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: muottiibeh
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: muottiibij
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: muottiibijd
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: muottiibáid
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: muottiibijn
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [muottiibijguin, muottiibijgijn]
    muottii+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: muottiibijttáá

    muottii+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: muottiimus
